Utah statutes.
53-2a-306.   Duties of the Division of Emergency Management and participating political subdivisions.

(1)  The division shall:

(a)  receive and maintain an inventory of the state and local services, equipment, supplies, personnel, and other resources related to participation in Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 4, Emergency Management Assistance Compact, and this part; and

(b)  make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to prepare and coordinate a process and plans so that the division may assist political subdivisions that are acting as agents of the state in mobilizing or demobilizing available assets in response to an intrastate or interstate disaster as provided in Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 4, Emergency Management Assistance Compact.

(2)  Each participating political subdivision in the Statewide Mutual Aid Act shall:

(a)  identify potential hazards that could affect the participating political subdivision;

(b)  conduct joint planning, intelligence sharing, and threat assessment development with contiguous participating political subdivisions and conduct joint training with them at least biennially;

(c)  identify and inventory the services, equipment, supplies, personnel, and other resources related to participating political subdivision's planning, prevention, mitigation, response, and recovery activities; and

(d)  adopt and implement the standardized incident management system approved by the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

